Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-303.01
Unconscionable act or practice; violation; determination.

(1) An unconscionable act or practice by a supplier in connection with a consumer transaction shall be a violation of the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act.

(2) The unconscionability of an act or practice shall be a question of law for the court. If it is claimed or appears to the court that an act or practice may be unconscionable, the parties shall be given a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its setting, purpose, and effect to aid the court in making its determination.

Laws 1974, LB 327, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB781, § 2.